Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 51

MASS
TRANSIT

Section

51-1 Grant of powers

51-2 Provision relating to purchase

51-3 Effect of amendment

51-4 Financing the acquisition, construction,
etc., of mass

transportation systems

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next